Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.080

Relation of this chapter to local regulation, taxation.

(1) The provisions of this chapter relating to the licensing for regulatory purposes of bail bond agents and bail bond agencies are exclusive. No governmental subdivision of this state may enact any laws or rules licensing for regulatory purposes such persons, except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent a political subdivision of this state from levying a business fee, business and occupation tax, or other tax upon bail bond agencies if such fees or taxes are levied by the political subdivision on other types of businesses within its boundaries.

(3) This section shall not be construed to prevent this state or a political subdivision of this state from licensing for regulatory purposes bail bond agencies with respect to activities that are not regulated under this chapter.

[ 1993 c 260 s 9.]